California, session 20252026, SB1419.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 511 of the Food and Agricultural Code is amended to read:511. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) California recognizes the importance of investing in the long-term prosperity of our food and farming system, starting with our farmers.(2)Farmers of color have historically not had equitable access to land and other resources necessary to conduct farming in California, and that legacy of prejudice persists.(3)Female farmers represent less than a quarter of all farmers in the state. Only 2 percent of California farmers are women of color, according to the United States Department of Agriculture Census of Agriculture.(4)Socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers tend to farm fewer acres but have a greater diversity of crops in California.(5)According to the United States Department of Agriculture Census of Agriculture, on average, socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers in California receive less in federal payments than their White counterparts and also earn less.(2) Historically, farmers and ranchers have faced barriers to accessing land, capital, technical assistance, and other resources necessary to conduct farming in California, and those barriers continue to affect agricultural viability for certain producers.(3) Farmers and ranchers operating small-scale or resource-constrained agricultural operations remain underrepresented within the broader agricultural economy and often face disproportionate challenges to sustaining viable operations.(4) Farmers and ranchers facing economic or structural barriers tend to farm fewer acres but have a greater diversity of crops.(5) According to the United States Department of Agriculture Census of Agriculture, farmers and ranchers operating small or limited resource operations in California receive fewer federal payments and earn disproportionately less on average than larger or more established operations.(6) Despite the barriers, an increasing number of socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers are attempting to farm throughout California, across rural and urban settings.(7)Existing federal agricultural policies have failed to provide sufficient and appropriate technical assistance and financial support, including farmer cooperative creation, for socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers.(7) Existing agricultural policies have not consistently provided sufficient or appropriately targeted technical assistance and financial support, including support for cooperative development, to farmers and ranchers facing economic barriers.(b) It is therefore the intent of the Legislature that the secretary should support socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers and include this support in the department’s vision and its relevant policies.SEC. 2. Section 512 of the Food and Agricultural Code is amended to read:512. For purposes of this article, both of the following terms have the following meanings: definitions apply:(a)“Secretary” refers to the Secretary of Food and Agriculture.(b)“Socially disadvantaged farmer or rancher” means a farmer or rancher who is a member of a socially disadvantaged group.(c)“Socially disadvantaged group” means a group whose members have been subjected to racial, ethnic, or gender prejudice because of their identity as members of a group without regard to their individual qualities. These groups include all of the following:(1)African Americans.(2)Native Indians.(3)Alaskan Natives.(4)Hispanics.(5)Asian Americans.(6)Native Hawaiians and Pacific Islanders.(a) (1) “Socially disadvantaged farmer or rancher” means a farmer or rancher who experiences barriers to agricultural viability due to economic or structural factors, as demonstrated by meeting one or more of the following criteria:(A) The farmer or rancher demonstrates, pursuant to guidelines adopted by the department, limited access to capital or commercial credit, including, but not limited to, financial capacity, collateral limitations, or net worth, excluding the value of the farm or ranch land and essential agricultural equipment.(B) The farmer or rancher is a “beginning farmer or rancher,” as defined in Section 760.107 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as that section read on June 17, 2025.(C) The farmer or rancher is a “limited resource farmer or rancher,” as defined in Section 760.107 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as that section read on June 17, 2025.(2) Nothing in this section, or in any program referencing this section, shall be construed to authorize the consideration of race, ethnicity, sex, or national origin in determining eligibility, prioritization, or participation.(d)(b) “Urbanized area,” as used by the United States Census Bureau, refers to a population of at least 50,000 people.SEC. 3. Section 90100 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:90100. For purposes of this division, the following definitions apply:(a) “Committee” means the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Bond Finance Committee created pursuant to Section 95002.(b) “Community” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 65302.10 of the Government Code.(c) “Critical community infrastructure” means infrastructure that is necessary to providing vital community and individual functions, including, but not limited to, drinking and wastewater infrastructure, emergency shelters, communication and warning systems, evacuation routes, emergency power and public medical facilities, schools, town halls, hospitals, health clinics, community centers, community nonprofit facilities providing essential services, libraries, homeless shelters, senior and youth centers, childcare facilities, food banks, grocery stores, and parks and recreation sites.(d) “Disadvantaged community” means a community with a median household income of less than 80 percent of the area average or less than 80 percent of statewide median household income.(e) “Economically distressed areas” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 79702 of the Water Code.(f) “Natural infrastructure” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 71154.(g) “Nonprofit organization” means a nonprofit corporation qualified to do business in California and qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.(h) “Protection” includes those actions necessary to prevent harm or damage to persons, property, or natural, cultural, and historic resources, actions to improve access to public open-space areas, or actions to allow the continued use and enjoyment of property or natural, cultural, and historic resources. Protection includes site monitoring, acquisition, development, restoration, preservation, and interpretation.(i) (1) “Restoration” includes the improvement of physical structures or facilities and, in the case of natural systems and landscape features, includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:(A) The control of erosion.(B) Stormwater capture, treatment, reuse, and storage, or to otherwise reduce stormwater pollution.(C) The control and elimination of invasive species and harmful algal blooms.(D) The planting of native species.(E) The removal of waste and debris.(F) Prescribed burning and other fuel hazard reduction measures.(G) Fencing out threats to existing or restored natural resources.(H) Improving instream, riparian, floodplain, or wetland habitat conditions.(I) Other plant and wildlife habitat improvement to increase the natural system value of the property or coastal or ocean resources.(J) Activities described in subdivision (b) of Section 79737 of the Water Code.(2) “Restoration” also includes activities, including the planning, permitting, monitoring, and reporting that are necessary to ensure successful implementation of the restoration objectives.(j) “Severely disadvantaged community” means a community with a median household income of less than 60 percent of the area average or less than 60 percent of statewide median household income.(k) “Socially disadvantaged farmer or rancher” has the same meaning set forth in Section 512 of the Food and Agricultural Code. Code, as that section read on November 5, 2024. This provision shall apply to the extent allowable by law.(l) “State General Obligation Bond Law” means the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), as it may be amended from time to time.(m) “Structure hardening” includes the installation, replacement, or retrofitting of building materials, systems, or assemblies used in the exterior design and construction of existing nonconforming structures with features that are in compliance with Chapter 7A (commencing with Section 701A.1) of Part 2 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations, or any appropriate successor regulatory code, with the primary purpose of reducing risk to structures from wildfire or conforming to the low-cost retrofit list, and updates to that list, developed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 51189 of the Government Code.(n) “Tribe” means a federally recognized Native American tribe or a nonfederally recognized Native American tribe listed on the California Tribal Consultation List maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission.(o) “Vulnerable population” means a subgroup of population within a region or community that faces a disproportionately heightened risk or increased sensitivity to impacts of climate change and that lacks adequate resources to cope with, adapt to, or recover from such impacts.(p) “Water board” means the State Water Resources Control Board.